Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2165.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "delinquent act" in section 6302 of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 6302. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Delinquent act."(1) The term means an act designated a crime under the law of this Commonwealth, or of another state if the act occurred in that state, or under Federal law, or an act which constitutes indirect criminal contempt under Chapter 62A 123456789101112131415161718 (relating to protection of victims of sexual violence or intimidation) with respect to sexual violence or 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to protection from abuse) or the failure of a child to comply with a lawful sentence imposed for a summary offense, in which event notice of the fact shall be certified to the court.(2) The term shall not include:(i) The crime of murder.(ii) Any of the following prohibited conduct where the child was 15 years of age or older at the time of the alleged conduct and a deadly weapon as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2301 (relating to definitions) was used during the commission of the offense which, if committed by an adult, would be classified as:(A) Rape as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3121 (relating to rape).(B) Involuntary deviate sexual intercourse as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3123 (relating to involuntary deviate sexual intercourse).(C) Aggravated assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2702(a)(1) or (2) (relating to aggravated assault).(D) Robbery as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3701(a)(1)(i), (ii) or (iii) (relating to robbery).(E) Robbery of motor vehicle as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3702 (relating to robbery of motor vehicle).(F) Aggravated indecent assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3125 (relating to aggravated indecent assault).(G) Kidnapping as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2901 20260HB2165PN2807 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (relating to kidnapping).(H) Voluntary manslaughter.(I) An attempt, conspiracy or solicitation to commit murder or any of these crimes as provided in 18 Pa.C.S. §§ 901 (relating to criminal attempt), 902 (relating to criminal solicitation) and 903 (relating to criminal conspiracy).(iii) Any of the following prohibited conduct where the child was 15 years of age or older at the time of the alleged conduct and has been previously adjudicated delinquent of any of the following prohibited conduct which, if committed by an adult, would be classified as:(A) Rape as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3121.(B) Involuntary deviate sexual intercourse as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3123.(C) Robbery as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3701(a)(1)(i), (ii) or (iii).(D) Robbery of motor vehicle as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3702.(E) Aggravated indecent assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3125.(F) Kidnapping as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2901.(G) Voluntary manslaughter.(H) An attempt, conspiracy or solicitation to commit murder or any of these crimes as provided in 18 Pa.C.S. §§ 901, 902 and 903.(iv) Summary offenses.(v) A crime committed by a child who has been found guilty in a criminal proceeding for other than a summary offense.20260HB2165PN2807 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vi) Any of the following prohibited conduct where the child was 15 years of age or older at the time of the alleged conduct, which, if committed by an adult, would be classified as:(A) Homicide by vehicle as defined in 75 Pa.C.S. § 3732 (relating to homicide by vehicle).(B) Homicide by vehicle while driving under influence as defined in 75 Pa.C.S. § 3735 (relating to homicide by vehicle while driving under influence).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2165PN2807 - 4 - 123456789101112